North Carolina, session 2025, SB412.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Beginning July 1, 2025, the Department of Health and Human
Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education, shall increase the child care
subsidy market rates to the seventy-fifth percentile as recommended by the 2023 Child Care
Market Rate Study for children in child care centers and homes with a rating of one to five stars.
SECTION 1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education (Division), the
sum of one hundred twenty-three million five hundred thousand dollars ($123,500,000) in
recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to implement the market rate
increases set forth in subsection (a) of this section. When the Division implements the market
rate increases under this section, the Division shall (i) add ten percent (10%) to be incorporated
into each adjusted rate for a rural county and (ii) add ten percent (10%) to be incorporated into
each adjusted rate for infants and toddlers (birth to 3 years of age). For purposes of this section,
"rural county" means a county with an average population density of 250 people per square mile
or less, as classified by the North Carolina Rural Center.
SECTION 2.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the councils of
governments in the regions designated in subsection (b) of this section the sum of eight million
dollars ($8,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to establish a two-year
pilot program coordinated by those councils of governments to build child care capacity in areas
impacted by Hurricane Helene. The councils of governments may only use the monies in their
member counties in the affected area, as defined in Section 1A.4 of S.L. 2024-57, that qualify
for Federal Emergency Management Agency Individual Assistance and Public Assistance
Categories A through G. Each designated council of governments shall issue a request for
application (RFA) for a vendor to contract with the respective council of governments to
administer the pilot program, and each vendor selected shall have experience providing support
and assistance to early child care providers. To receive funds, the vendor shall partner with the
councils of governments in the respective designated regions to (i) increase the supply of child
care programs by recruiting and coaching prospective child care providers through the initial
business planning and implementation process and (ii) ensure sustainability by executing a
two-year mentorship program for the new child care programs created pursuant to this section.
SECTION 2.(b) Funds provided under this section shall be allocated based on
population of children under 5 years of age in the councils of governments' regions as follows:
*S412-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) One million five hundred forty thousand dollars ($1,540,000) to the Foothills
Regional Commission.
(2) One million nine hundred thousand dollars ($1,900,000) to the Land of Sky
Regional Council.
(3) One million three hundred ninety thousand dollars ($1,390,000) to the High
Country Council of Governments.
(4) One million three hundred thirty thousand dollars ($1,330,000) to the
Southwestern Commission Council of Governments.
(5) One million eight hundred forty thousand dollars ($1,840,000) to the Western
Piedmont Council of Governments.
SECTION 2.(c) The councils of governments participating in the pilot program may
use (i) a portion of these funds for additional solutions provided by the vendor within the early
childhood education space to meet localized needs and in support of recovery, rehabilitation, and
ongoing needs of their member communities and (ii) up to two percent (2%) of the funds
allocated to the respective council of governments under this act for administrative costs.
SECTION 2.(d) The councils of governments participating in the pilot program shall
submit an initial progress report by January 1, 2026, and additional progress reports every six
months thereafter for the duration of the pilot program to the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division. The reports shall
include, at a minimum, the following:
(1) The number of child care programs created through the pilot program, by
county within each councils of governments region participating in the pilot
program.
(2) The number of child care programs created that are child care centers and the
number that are family child care homes.
(3) The number of new child care slots created by the pilot program.
(4) The costs associated with creating the child care programs, including any
administrative costs.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 Senate Bill 412-First Edition